Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1313
Property; assessment; duty of county officer to assist; penalty.

It shall be the duty of the register of deeds, county clerk, county judge, clerk of the district court and all other county officers to assist the county assessor, in the examination of the records of their respective offices, and they shall give to the county assessor any information in their possession that will assist him in the assessment of property. Any county officer, who shall fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties imposed upon him by this section, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in the sum of not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars for each offense.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 144, p. 427;

R.S.1913, § 6429;

C.S.1922, § 5964;

C.S.1929, § 77-1610;

R.S.1943, § 77-1313.